Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4506
Reasonable reliance.

A trustee or other person that reasonably relies on the validity of a distribution of part or all of the property of a trust to another trust, or a modification of a trust, under the Uniform Trust Decanting Act, law of this state other than the act, or the law of another jurisdiction is not liable to any person for any action or failure to act as a result of the reliance.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 16.